Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.100

Reinstatement.

A person whose license has been suspended or revoked under this chapter may petition the disciplinary authority for reinstatement after an interval of time and upon conditions determined by the disciplinary authority in the order suspending or revoking the license. The disciplinary authority shall act on the petition in accordance with the adjudicative proceedings provided under chapter 34.05 RCW and may impose such conditions as authorized by RCW 18.235.110. The disciplinary authority may require successful completion of an examination as a condition of reinstatement.

[ 2007 c 256 s 17; 2002 c 86 s 111.]